Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB263.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 301(18) and 401 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, are amended to read:Section 301. As used in this act:* * *[(18) "Maintenance of membership" means that all employes 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 who have joined an employe organization or who join the employe organization in the future must remain members for the duration of a collective bargaining agreement so providing with the proviso that any such employe or employes may resign from such employe organization during a period of fifteen days prior to the expiration of any such agreement.]* * *Section 401. It shall be lawful for public employes to organize, form, join or assist in employe organizations or to engage in lawful concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection or to bargain collectively through representatives of their own free choice and such employes shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities[, except as may be required pursuant to a maintenance of membership provision in a collective bargaining agreement].Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 402. (Reserved).Section 402.1. The following apply regarding rights and privileges:(1) Public employes shall have equal rights and privileges, without regard to membership in an employe organization, to attend all meetings at which collective bargaining agreements governing their employment will be submitted for ratification and to participate in the deliberations and voting upon the ratification on equal terms with members of the employe organization.(2) An employe organization may not limit or condition the right of a public employe to:(i) speak and express views, arguments or opinions regarding 20250HB0263PN0208 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the employe organization or business properly before the employe organization;(ii) associate or disassociate from membership with the employe organization at any time; or(iii) cease payment of dues upon resignation of union membership.(3) Each member of an employe organization shall have the right to transparency and uniformity regarding membership dues, initiation fees and assessments charged by the employe organization.(4) On an annual basis, an employe organization shall provide to the members of the employe organization a full accounting of the activities of the employe organization and the amount of dues, initiation fees and assessments charged to each member.(5) Each public employe of an employe organization is entitled to receive a copy of the membership card, form, agreement, contract or other document governing the public employe's membership with the employe organization, upon the execution of the document.(6) With respect to the documents referenced in clause (5), the secretary or corresponding principal officer of an employe organization shall:(i) Maintain copies of the documents at the principal office of the employe organization.(ii) Upon the request of a public employe whose rights are affected by the agreement or contract, provide the documents to the public employe immediately and in electronic form.Section 403. (Reserved).Section 403.1. A person whose rights secured by section 20250HB0263PN0208 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 402.1 have been infringed by a violation of section 402.1 of this article may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate relief and shall be entitled to reasonable costs and attorney fees if the person prevails in the civil action.Section 3. Section 705 of the act is amended to read:Section 705. Membership dues deductions [and maintenance of membership] are proper subjects of bargaining [with the proviso that as to the latter, the payment of dues and assessments while members, may be the only requisite employment condition].Section 4. The amendment or addition of sections 301(18), 401, 402.1, 403.1 and 705 of the act shall apply to collective bargaining agreements and contracts entered into or extended or modified on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0263PN0208 - 4 - 123456789101112131415